Missouri, session 2026, HB1820.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 376.1758, to read as follows:
376.1758. 1. For purposes of this section, the term "doula" means an individual
who has been trained to provide physical, emotional, and educational support, but not
medical or midwifery care, to pregnant and birthing women and their families before,
during, and after childbirth.
2. The department of health and senior services shall review and approve doula
registration to allow for health insurance reimbursement of doula services.
3. The department of health and senior services shall:
(1) Create the criteria for the doula registration application;
(2) Review applications for doulas to register to receive health insurance
reimbursement in this state;
(3) Approve or deny applications for doula registration based on the criteria
created under subdivision (1) of this subsection;
(4) Notify applicants of approval or denial of doula registration. Any denial
notification shall include the specific reason or reasons for the denial; and
(5) Maintain a statewide registry of doulas approved for health insurance
reimbursement in this state.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1820 2
4. In creating the criteria for the doula registration application to be used to
approve doula registration, the department of health and senior services shall consult
relevant organizations including, but not limited to, the Missouri Community Doula
Council and other community doula organizations that support access to community-
based doula services in the state.
5. Nothing in this section prohibits any person from practicing as a doula in this
state regardless of whether the person is registered in accordance with the provisions of
this section.
6. The department of health and senior services shall promulgate all necessary
rules and regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and
chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔